Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska16-672.04
Ordinance; adoption.

Upon compliance with sections 16-672.01 to 16-672.03, the mayor and city council may, by ordinance, order the making and construction of the improvements provided for in section 16-672.01. To adopt such ordinance, a majority of the whole number of members elected to the city council shall be required; Provided, that if the vote be a tie, the mayor may vote to break such tie.

Laws 1961, c. 46, § 4, p. 179.